Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-282.1.
Permanency planning hearing for children in foster care.

In the case of a child who was the subject of a foster care plan filed with the court pursuant to §

16.1-281

, a permanency planning hearing shall be held within 10 months of the dispositional hearing at which the foster care plan pursuant to §

16.1-281

was reviewed if the child (a) was placed through an agreement between the parents or guardians and the local board of social services where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians and such agreement has not been dissolved by court order; or (b) is under the legal custody of a local board of social services or a child welfare agency and has not had a petition to terminate parental rights filed on the child’s behalf, has not been placed in permanent foster care, or is age 16 or over and the plan for the child is not independent living. The board or child welfare agency shall file a petition for a permanency planning hearing 30 days prior to the date of the permanency planning hearing scheduled by the court. The purpose of this hearing is to establish a permanent goal for the child and either to achieve the permanent goal or to defer such action through the approval of an interim plan for the child.To achieve the permanent goal, the petition for a permanency planning hearing shall seek to (i) transfer the custody of the child to his prior family, or dissolve the board’s placement agreement and return the child to his prior family; (ii) transfer custody of the child to a relative other than the child’s prior family or to fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1305

or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1306

, subject to the provisions of subsection A1; (iii) terminate residual parental rights pursuant to §

16.1-277.01

or

16.1-283

; (iv) place a child who is 16 years of age or older in permanent foster care pursuant to §

63.2-908

; (v) if the child has been admitted to the United States as a refugee or asylee and has attained the age of 16 years or older and the plan is independent living, direct the board or agency to provide the child with services to transition from foster care; or (vi) place a child who is 16 years of age or older in another planned permanent living arrangement in accordance with the provisions of subsection A2. If the child has been in the custody of a local board or child welfare agency for 15 of the most recent 22 months and no petition for termination of parental rights has been filed with the court, the local board or child welfare agency shall state in its petition for a permanency planning hearing (a) the reasons, pursuant to subdivision A 1, 2, or 3 of §

63.2-910.2

, why a petition for termination of parental rights has not been filed and (b) the reasonable efforts made regarding reunification or transfer of custody to a relative and the timeline of such efforts. In cases in which a foster care plan approved prior to July 1, 2011, includes independent living as the goal for a child who is not admitted to the United States as an asylee or refugee, the petition shall direct the board or agency to provide the child with services to transition from foster care.For approval of an interim plan, the petition for a permanency planning hearing shall seek to continue custody with the board or agency, or continue placement with the board through a parental agreement; or transfer custody to the board or child welfare agency from the parents or guardian of a child who has been in foster care through an agreement where the parents or guardian retains custody.Upon receipt of the petition, if a permanency planning hearing has not already been scheduled, the court shall schedule such a hearing to be held within 30 days. The permanency planning hearing shall be held within 10 months of the dispositional hearing at which the foster care plan was reviewed pursuant to § 16.1-281. The provisions of subsection B of §

16.1-282

shall apply to this petition. The procedures of subsection C of §

16.1-282

and the provisions of subsection G of § 16.1-282 shall apply to the scheduling and notice of proceedings under this section.

The board or child welfare agency shall petition for alternative (vi) of subsection A only if the child has a severe and chronic emotional, physical or neurological disabling condition for which the child requires long-term residential treatment; and the board or child welfare agency has thoroughly investigated the feasibility of the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (v) of subsection A and determined that none of those alternatives is in the best interests of the child. In a foster care plan filed with the petition pursuant to this section, the board or agency shall document the following: (i) the investigation conducted of the placement alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (v) of subsection A and why each of these is not currently in the best interest of the child; (ii) at least one compelling reason why none of the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (v) is achievable for the child at the time placement in another planned permanent living arrangement is selected as the permanent goal for the child; (iii) the identity of the long-term residential treatment service provider; (iv) the nature of the child’s disability; (v) the anticipated length of time required for the child’s treatment; and (vi) the status of the child’s eligibility for admission and long-term treatment. The court shall ensure that the local department has documentation of the intensive, ongoing, and, as of the date of the hearing, unsuccessful efforts made to return the child home or secure a placement for the child with a fit and willing relative, including adult siblings, or an adoptive parent, including through efforts that utilize search technology, including social media, to find the child’s biological family members. The court shall ask the child about the child’s desired permanency outcome and make a judicial determination, accompanied by an explanation of the reasons that the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (iii) of subsection A continue to not be in the best interest of the child.

Before approving alternative (vi) of subsection A as the plan for the child, the court shall find (i) that the child has a severe and chronic emotional, physical or neurological disabling condition; (ii) that the child requires long-term residential treatment for the disabling condition; and (iii) that none of the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (v) of subsection A is achievable for the child at the time placement in another planned permanent living arrangement is approved as the permanent goal for the child. If the board or agency petitions for alternative (vi), alternative (vi) may be approved by the court for a period of six months at a time.

At the conclusion of the permanency planning hearing, if alternative (vi) of subsection A is the permanent plan, the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within six months to review the child’s placement in another planned permanent living arrangement in accordance with subdivision A2 4. All parties present at the hearing at which clause (vi) of subsection A is approved as the permanent plan for the child shall be given notice of the date scheduled for the foster care review hearing. Parties not present shall be summoned to appear as provided in §

16.1-263

. Otherwise, this subsection A2 shall govern the scheduling and notice for such hearings.

The court shall review a foster care plan for any child who is placed in another planned permanent living arrangement every six months from the date of the permanency planning hearing held pursuant to this subsection, so long as the child remains in the legal custody of the board or child welfare agency. The board or child welfare agency shall file such petitions for review pursuant to the provisions of § 16.1-282 and shall, in addition, include in the petition the information required by subdivision A2 1. The petition for foster care review shall be filed no later than 30 days prior to the hearing scheduled in accordance with subdivision A2 3. At the conclusion of the foster care review hearing, if alternative (vi) of subsection A remains the permanent plan, the court shall enter an order that states whether reasonable efforts have been made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan and to monitor the child’s status in another planned permanent living arrangement.However, if at any time during the six-month approval periods permitted by this subsection, a determination is made by treatment providers that the child’s need for long-term residential treatment for the child’s disabling condition is eliminated, the board or agency shall immediately begin to plan for post-discharge services and shall, within 30 days of making such a determination, file a petition for a permanency planning hearing pursuant to subsection A. Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall schedule a permanency planning hearing to be held within 30 days. The provisions of subsection B of § 16.1-282 shall apply to this petition. The procedures of subsection C of § 16.1-282 and the provisions of subsection G of § 16.1-282 shall apply to proceedings under this section.

The following requirements shall apply to the selection and approval of an interim plan for the child in accordance with subsection A:

The board or child welfare agency shall petition for approval of an interim plan only if the board or child welfare agency has thoroughly investigated the feasibility of the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (v) of subsection A and determined that none of those alternatives is in the best interest of the child. If the board or agency petitions for approval of an interim plan, such plan may be approved by the court for a maximum period of six months. The board or agency shall also file a foster care plan that (i) identifies a permanent goal for the child that corresponds with one of the alternatives specified in clauses (i) through (v) of subsection A; (ii) includes provisions for accomplishing the permanent goal within six months; and (iii) summarizes the investigation conducted of the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (v) of subsection A and why achieving each of these is not in the best interest of the child at this time. The foster care plan shall describe the child’s placement, including the in-state and out-of-state placement options and whether the child’s placement is in state or out of state. If the child’s placement is out of state, the foster care plan shall provide the reason why the out-of-state placement is appropriate and in the best interests of the child.

Before approving an interim plan for the child, the court shall find:

When returning home remains the plan for the child, that the parent has made marked progress toward reunification with the child, the parent has maintained a close and positive relationship with the child, and the child is likely to return home within the near future, although it is premature to set an exact date for return at the time of this hearing; or

When returning home is not the plan for the child, that marked progress is being made to achieve the permanent goal identified by the board or child welfare agency and that it is premature to set an exact date for accomplishing the goal at the time of this hearing. The court shall consider the in-state and out-of-state placement options, and if the child has been placed out of state, determine whether the out-of-state placement is appropriate and in the best interests of the child.

Upon approval of an interim plan, the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within six months to determine that the permanent goal is accomplished and to enter an order consistent with alternative (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subsection A. All parties present at the initial permanency planning hearing shall be given notice of the date scheduled for the second permanency planning hearing. Parties not present shall be summoned to appear as provided in §

16.1-263

. Otherwise, subsection A shall govern the scheduling and notice for such hearings.

In each permanency planning hearing and in any hearing regarding the transition of the child from foster care to independent living, the court shall consult with the child in an age-appropriate manner regarding the proposed permanency plan or transition plan for the child, unless the court finds that such consultation is not in the best interests of the child.

In cases in which a child is placed by the local board of social services or a licensed child-placing agency in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in §

16.1-228

, the provisions of subsection E of §

16.1-281

shall apply to any hearing held pursuant to this section.

At the conclusion of the permanency planning hearing held pursuant to this section, whether action is taken or deferred to achieve the permanent goal for the child, the court shall enter an order that states whether reasonable efforts have been made to reunite the child with the child’s prior family, if returning home is the permanent goal for the child; or whether reasonable efforts have been made to achieve the permanent goal identified by the board or agency, if the goal is other than returning the child home.In making this determination, the court shall give consideration to whether the board or agency has placed the child in a timely manner in accordance with the foster care plan and completed the steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

A1.

The following requirements shall apply to the transfer of custody of the child to a relative other than the child’s prior family or to fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1305

or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1306

in accordance with the provisions of clause (ii) of subsection A. Any order transferring custody of the child to a relative other than the child’s prior family shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the relative is one who, after an investigation as directed by the court, (i) is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect; and the order shall so state. The court’s order transferring custody to a relative should further provide, as appropriate, for any terms or conditions which would promote the child’s interest and welfare.

A2.

The following requirements shall apply to the selection and approval of placement in another planned permanent living arrangement as the permanent goal for the child in accordance with clause (vi) of subsection A:

A3.

The following requirements shall apply to the selection and approval of permanent foster care pursuant to clause (iv) of subsection A:

1.

The court shall ensure that the local department has documentation of the intensive, ongoing, and, as of the date of the hearing, unsuccessful efforts made to return the child home or secure a placement for the child with a fit and willing relative, including adult siblings, or an adoptive parent, including through efforts that utilize search technology, including social media, to find the child’s biological family members.

2.

The court shall ask the child about the child’s desired permanency outcome and make a judicial determination, accompanied by an explanation of the reasons that the alternatives listed in clauses (i) through (iii) of subsection A continue to not be in the best interest of the child.

History.

1997, c. 790; 1998, c. 550; 1999, c. 889; 2000, c. 385; 2002, c. 512; 2008, cc. 475, 483, 678; 2011, c. 730; 2013, c. 130; 2016, c. 631; 2017, c. 190; 2019, cc. 282, 688; 2020, cc. 224, 366, 934; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 254.

Cross references.

As to appointment of counsel for parent or guardian of minor child, see §

16.1-266

.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 934, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations that (i) establish clear guidance for local boards of social services (local boards) and child-placing agencies regarding acceptable reasons for not filing a petition for termination of parental rights, case planning protocols, and applicable timelines; (ii) require local boards and child-placing agencies to consult with the Commissioner of Social Services (the Commissioner) or his designee regarding case planning for children who have been in the custody of the local board or agency for 12 months and for whom reunification remains a goal; (iii) require local boards and child-placing agencies to (a) conduct independent living needs assessments and develop transition plans within 30 days of a child in foster care reaching 14 years of age or within 30 days of a child who is 14 years of age or older entering foster care and (b) update such assessments and plans annually; and (iv) require local boards and child-placing agencies to report to the Commissioner or his designee all instances in which a petition for termination of parental rights has not been filed for a child who has been in the custody of a local board or child-placing agency for 15 of the most recent 22 months, which shall include a clear description of the reasons why such petition has not been filed and the reasonable efforts made regarding reunification or placement of the child with a relative. The Commissioner shall compile the information set forth in clause (iv) into a de-identified annual report and provide such report to all local boards and child-placing agencies. The Commissioner shall use the information contained in the report to establish a training program that educates local boards and child-placing agencies regarding common errors made by local boards and child-placing agencies when declining to file a petition for termination of parental rights.”

Acts 2020, c. 934, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services shall develop clear guidance documents for local boards of social services and child-placing agencies that explain the process through which a parent may voluntarily terminate parental rights and the manner in which such information should be relayed to the parent.”

Acts 2020, c. 934, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services (the Commissioner) shall establish a work group to review the feasibility and costs of establishing a standard for supervisory spans of control that would limit the number of caseworkers that a foster care supervisor may oversee. The Commissioner shall report the findings and recommendations of the work group to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and the House Committee on Appropriations by November 30, 2020.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, cl. 2 provides: “The Board of Social Services (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. Such regulations shall include conditions for establishing a kinship guardianship, requirements for the development and amendment of a kinship guardianship assistance agreement, and circumstances that qualify a prospective kinship guardian for exemption from the relative foster home approval process. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 1998 amendment

substituted “ten months” for “eleven months” in subsection A and substituted “eleven months” for “twelve months” in the second sentence of the second paragraph in subsection B.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, substituted “is not receiving services to achieve independent living status or is not” for “an independent living arrangement or,” substituted “§

16.1-277.01

” for “§

16.1-278.3

” in clause (i) and substituted “direct the board or agency to provide the child with services to achieve independent living status” for “place the child in an independent living arrangement” in clause (iii); in subsection B, in the first paragraph, substituted “subsection A” for “this section” in two places, and substituted “1 through 6” for “1 through 7” in the second paragraph; in subsection C, inserted “of subsection A” in the introductory language, and in the second paragraph of subdivision 2, inserted “enter an order that states whether reasonable efforts have been made to reunite the child with his or her family, if returning home remains the plan for the child; or whether reasonable efforts have been made to achieve the permanent goal identified by the board, when returning home is not the plan for the child. The court shall,” and deleted “the” preceding “such hearings” near the end of the paragraph; and in subsection D, substituted “receiving services to achieve independent living status” for “placed in an independent living arrangement,” and added the last two sentences.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385, in subsection A, deleted “(i) the court’s approval of the entrustment agreement pursuant to §

16.1-277.01

or (ii)” following “ten months of,” inserted “subject to the provisions of subsection A1 of this section” in clause (ii), redesignated former clauses (vi) and (vii) as present clauses (vii) and (viii), and inserted “place the child in another planned permanent living arrangement in accordance with the provisions of subsection A2 of this section” following the clause (vi) designation; added subsections A1 and A2; in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “(vii) or (viii)” for “(vi) or (vii)” and inserted “of this section,” in the second sentence, substituted “alternative (vii) or (viii)” for “alternatives (vi) or (vii),” substituted “(vii) or (viii)” for “(vi) or (vii),” and substituted “each of these is” for “they are” in the last sentence; substituted “(vii) or (viii)” for “(vi) or (vii)” in the introductory language and the last paragraph of subsection C; and in subsection D, substituted “for whom a final order of adoption has not been entered” for “who has not been placed for adoption” in clause (ii), and in the third sentence, deleted “or § ” following “16.1-277.02” and deleted “subsection F of” preceding “§

16.1-283

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 512 rewrote the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are almost identical, and
substituted “age 16 or over and the plan for the child is not independent living” for “not receiving services to achieve independent living status” at the end of clause (b) in subsection A; in the second paragraph of subsection A, in clause (v), deleted “direct the board or agency to provide the child with services to achieve independent living status,” at the beginning
and inserted “or over and the plan is independent living, direct the board or agency to provide the child with services to transition from foster care” at the end; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment by c. 678, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, deleted “or a public agency designated by the community policy and management team” following “board of social services” in clause (a), deleted
“public agency” preceding “or child welfare” near the beginning of the second sentence; in the second paragraph, deleted “or public agency’s” preceding “placement agreement” in clause (i); in the third paragraph, deleted “or public agency” following “placement with the board”; in subdivision A2 1, deleted “public agency” following “the board” twice in the first sentence; in subdivision A2 4, deleted “public agency” following “the board” twice in the first paragraph; in subdivision B 1, deleted “public agency” following “the board” twice in the first sentence; and in subdivision B 2 b, deleted “public agency” following “the board”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 730, in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “been admitted to the United States as a refugee or asylee and has” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, in subsection A, substituted “10 months” for “11 months” in the first sentence of the first paragraph and in the second sentence of the fourth paragraph, and substituted “30 days prior to the date of the permanency planning hearing scheduled by the court” for “within 10 months of the dispositional hearing at which the foster care plan was reviewed pursuant to §

16.1-281

” at the end of the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631, in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “a child who is 16 years of age or older” for “the child” twice in the first sentence; and added the last two sentences in subdivision A2 1; added subsection A3; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 190 added the last two sentences in subdivision B 1 and the last sentence in subdivision B 2 b; inserted subsection C, and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 282 and 688 are identical, and added subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E, updated statutory references, and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by cc. 224 and 366 are identical, and in the second paragraph in subsection A and in subsection A1, inserted “or to fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1305

.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 934 inserted the penultimate sentence in subsection A, second paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “Federal-Funded” preceding “Kinship Guardianship Assistance program” and inserted “or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1306

” in clause (ii) in the first sentence in the second paragraph in subsection A and in the first sentence in subsection A1.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 16.1-282.2.
Annual foster care review.

The court shall review a foster care plan annually for any child who remains in the legal custody of a local board of social services or a child welfare agency and (i) on whose behalf a petition to terminate parental rights has been granted, filed or ordered to be filed, (ii) who is placed in permanent foster care, or (iii) who is age 16 or over and for whom the plan is independent living. The foster care review hearing shall be scheduled at the conclusion of a hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-281

,

16.1-282

, or

16.1-282.1

at which the order is entered: terminating parental rights, directing the filing of a petition for termination of parental rights by the board or agency, placing the child in permanent foster care, or directing the board or agency to provide the child who is age 16 or over and for whom the plan is independent living with services to transition from foster care. The foster care review hearing shall be held within 12 months of the date of such order, so long as the child remains in the custody of the board or agency.The board or agency shall file the petition for a foster care review hearing, and the court shall provide notice of the foster care review hearing in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-282

. The board or agency shall file a written Adoption Progress Report with the juvenile court pursuant to §

16.1-277.01

,

16.1-277.02

,

16.1-278.3

, or

16.1-283

, if applicable, with the petition required by this section. The court order entered at the conclusion of the hearing held on the petition shall state whether reasonable efforts have been made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the approved foster care plan that established a permanent goal for the child and to complete the steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

At the foster care review hearing in the case of a child who is placed in permanent foster care, the court shall give consideration to the appropriateness of the services being provided to the child and permanent foster parents, to any change in circumstances since the entry of the order placing the child in permanent foster care, and to such other factors as the court deems proper.

At the foster care review hearing in the case of a child who meets the criteria of subdivisions A 1 through 4 of §

16.1-283.2

, the court shall inquire of the guardian ad litem and the local board of social services whether the child has expressed a preference that the possibility of restoring the parental rights of his parent or parents be investigated. If the child expresses or has expressed such a preference, the court shall direct the local board of social services or the child’s guardian ad litem to conduct an investigation of the parent or parents. If, following such investigation, the local board of social services or the child’s guardian ad litem deems it appropriate to do so, either may file a petition for the restoration of parental rights. A hearing on such petition shall be held as provided by §

16.1-283.2

.

In cases in which a child is placed by the local board of social services or a licensed child-placing agency in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in §

16.1-228

, the provisions of subsection E of §

16.1-281

shall apply to any hearing held pursuant to this section.

History.

2002, c. 512; 2008, cc. 475, 483; 2018, c. 104; 2019, cc. 282, 688.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are almost identical, and, in subsection A, substituted “who is age 16 or over and for whom the plan is independent living” for “who is receiving services to achieve independent living status” in clause (iii) and substituted “who is age 16 or over and for whom the plan is independent living with services to transition from foster care” for “with services to achieve independent living status” at the end of the second sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 104 added subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 282 and 688 are identical, and added subsection D.

Law Review.

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).